Utah statutes.
23-27-302.   Conveyance or equipment detainment or quarantine.

(1)  The division, a port-of-entry agent, or a peace officer may detain or quarantine a conveyance or equipment if:

(a)  the division, agent, or peace officer:

(i)  finds the conveyance or equipment contains a Dreissena mussel; or

(ii)  reasonably believes that the person transporting the conveyance or equipment is in violation of Section 23-27-201; or

(b)  the person transporting the conveyance or equipment refuses to submit to an inspection authorized by Section 23-27-301.

(2)  The detainment or quarantine authorized by Subsection (1) may continue for:

(a)  up to five days; or

(b)  the period of time necessary to:

(i)  decontaminate the conveyance or equipment; and

(ii)  ensure that a Dreissena mussel is not living on or in the conveyance or equipment.



Enacted by Chapter 284, 2008 General Session

